Arkansas, session 2025, HB1280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-1-1202, concerning the definitions for
the laws on prohibited contracts by state agencies, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(5) "Public funds" means the same as defined in § 19-11-203;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-1-1204. Promotional items made in China prohibited.
A state agency shall not spend public funds to purchase promotional
items made in the People's Republic of China.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. The name of Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter
*LGL038*
01/28/2025 8:11:06 AM LGL038

HB1280
1, Subchapter 12 is changed from "Prohibited Contracts by State Agencies" to
"Prohibited Actions by State Agencies." The Arkansas Code Revision Commission
shall make all changes in the Arkansas Code necessary to implement this
section.
































01/28/2025 8:11:06 AM LGL038